Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF35.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.91, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Student left on a bus; parent notification. new text end new text begin If a student is left unattended on a school bus after the completion of the bus route, the school district must notify the student's parent or guardian and the Department of Education as soon as practicable. The Department of Education must notify local law enforcement and the State Patrol within 24 hours of receiving the report from the school district. new text end